Nebraska, session 109, LB590.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB590 LB590
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 37-335, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
37-335 (1) Commencing January 1, 1977, whenever the commission
acquires title to private lands for wildlife management purposes, the
commission shall annually make payments in lieu of taxes to the county
treasurer of the county in which the land is located. Commencing January
1, 1997, the payments shall be the same as the real property taxes which
would have been paid on the land if it were owned by a private owner. The
value of the land shall be determined by the county assessor pursuant to
sections 77-201 and 77-1301 to 77-1371 as if it were being used for the
use it had immediately before acquisition by the commission excluding any
improvements on the land either before or after its acquisition. The
commission may protest the valuation of such land to the county board of
equalization pursuant to section 77-1502 if the commission believes the
land is not properly valued. The county board of equalization shall treat
such protest in the same manner as any other protest pursuant to sections
77-1502 to 77-1509. The action of the county board of equalization on
such protest may be appealed as provided in section 77-1510. The county
treasurer shall allocate such payments to each taxing unit levying taxes
on such property in the county in which the land has tax situs in the
same proportion that the levy on the property of such taxing unit bears
to the total levy on such real property of all the taxing units in which
the property is taxed.
(2) The Department of Transportation may by rule and regulation
establish, use, and operate a mitigation bank or an in-lieu fee program
in accordance with applicable state and federal laws.
(3) The purpose of the mitigation bank or in-lieu fee program is to
provide compensatory mitigation for the incidental take of threatened or
endangered species and such species' suitable habitat arising out of
permitted activities, and restoring, creating, enhancing, preserving, or
any combination thereof, habitats or resources where the Department of
-2-

LB590 LB590
2025 2025
Transportation or other individual or entity is required to provide
compensatory mitigation for permitted activities.
(4) State regulatory agencies shall make a good faith effort to use
and give priority to the mitigation bank and in-lieu fee program
established by the Department of Transportation when consulting on or
reviewing mitigation plans for the impacts of permitted state
transportation projects.
(5) If the Department of Transportation establishes a mitigation
bank or an in-lieu fee program pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, the Department of Transportation may:
(a) Enter into one or many cooperative agreements with a state or
local public agency or private party for the establishment, use,
operation, and maintenance of the mitigation bank or in-lieu fee program;
(b) Acquire title to real property through purchase, bequest,
donation, or eminent domain for use with the mitigation bank or in-lieu
fee program to mitigate the impacts of permitted projects;
(c) Establish or restore suitable habitat and natural resources for
threatened and endangered species and impacts to the environment and
natural resources across Nebraska;
(d) Provide a consistent and simplified approach to address
mitigation requirements associated with permits or authorizations issued
by federal and state agencies;
(e) Streamline the permitting process, minimize delays in permit
decisions, and decrease the burden of permit applicants of planning and
performing compensatory mitigation for suitable habitat losses and
adverse environmental and natural resources effects of permitted
projects;
(f) Increase the ecological efficiency and effectiveness of
compensatory mitigation;
(g) Achieve replacement of impacted acres of land by providing for
the establishment of a net increase in suitable habitat acres, functions,
-3-

LB590 LB590
2025 2025
and values for endangered and threatened species and other natural
resources through using a fair, reasonable, and practicable ratio of
compensatory mitigation acres to offset the impacts of a permitted
project; and
(h) Achieve a net increase in conservation land functions and values
for endangered and threatened species and other natural resources
impacted by permitted projects.
(6) A state or local agency or private party that owns the
mitigation bank acquired to restore, enhance, preserve, or create
suitable habitat shall also pay a sum in lieu of ad valorem taxes lost by
the county.
Sec. 2. Original section 37-335, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-